Arkansas, session 2025, HB1490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-503(f), concerning the requirement to
return certain items to a public school in order to be eligible to enroll in
a home school, is repealed.
(f)(1) A student who is enrolled in a public school and who has been
temporarily issued items, resources, supplies, materials, or other property
belonging to the public school at which he or she is enrolled is eligible for
enrollment in a home school after:
(A) The items, resources, supplies, materials, or other
property belonging to the public school district at which the student is
enrolled have been returned to the public school;
*TNL001*
02/13/2025 5:13:14 PM TNL001

HB1490
(B) The items, resources, supplies, materials, or other
property belonging to the public school district at which the student is
enrolled have been paid for; or
(C) The semester has ended.
(2) However, the public school district superintendent or the
local school district board of directors may waive the required five-school-
day waiting period required under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section if
the public school district superintendent or the local school district board
of directors is satisfied with the return of temporarily issued items,
resources, supplies, materials, or other property belonging to a public
school student.

























02/13/2025 5:13:14 PM TNL001